Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 1 General Powers and Duties of Municipality

Law reviews.

For article, “Revisionist Municipal Liability,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 375 (2018).

32-4-90.
Acquisition of rights of way.

Acquisition of rights of way for public roads on the state highway system located within the corporate limits of a municipality shall be made in compliance with subsection (e) of Code Section 32-3-3 and Code Section 32-5-25.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-501, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-4-91.
Construction and maintenance of systems; acquisition of labor; maximum bridge weight; notification of department about new streets and abandoned streets.

A municipality shall plan, designate, improve, manage, control, construct, and maintain an adequate municipal street system and shall have control of and responsibility for all construction, maintenance, or other work related to the municipal street system. Such work may be accomplished through the use of municipal forces, including inmate labor, by contract as authorized in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 32-4-92, or otherwise as permitted by law.

(a.1)

A municipality shall post on each bridge on the municipal street system and on each approach thereto on the municipal street a sign containing a legible notice showing the maximum safe weight limit for such bridge, each such sign to conform to the department regulations promulgated under authority of Code Section 32-6-50.

A municipality shall notify the department within three months after a municipal street is added to the municipal street system and shall further notify the department within three months after a municipal street is abandoned. This notification shall be accompanied by an appropriate digital file, map, or plat depicting the location of the new or abandoned street.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-502, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 953, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 32; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1206, § 2; Ga. L. 2011, p. 583, § 7/HB 137.

Cross references.

Weight of vehicle and load, §

32-6-26

.

Promulgation of rules and regulations governing hiring out of inmates, §

42-5-60

.

32-4-92.
Powers.

The powers of a municipality with respect to its municipal street system, unless otherwise expressly limited by law, shall include but not be limited to the following:

Subject to the limitations of subparagraph (d)(1)(A) of Code Section 32-2-61, a municipality has the authority to contract with any person, the federal government or its agencies, the state or its agencies, other municipalities, a county in which the municipality lies, or any combination of the foregoing entities for the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of any public road located within the municipality;

A municipality may accept and use federal and state funds for municipal street purposes and do all things necessary, proper, or expedient to achieve compliance with the provisions and requirements of all applicable federal-aid acts and programs. Nothing in this title is intended to conflict with any such federal-aid law and, in case of such conflict, such portion as may be in conflict with such federal law is declared of no effect to the extent of the conflict;

A municipality may acquire, manage, and dispose of real property or any interests therein for public roads on its municipal street system under the procedures provided in Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title and in Chapter 7 of this title. In acquiring property for rights of way for federal-aid highway projects on its system, the municipality shall comply with the requirements of the applicable provisions of the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policy Act of 1970, as amended by the Uniform Relocation Act Amendments of 1987, Title IV of Public Law 100-17, and in general be guided by the policies applicable to the department as set forth in Code Section 32-8-1. For good cause shown, a municipality, at any time after commencement of condemnation proceedings and prior to final judgment therein, may dismiss its condemnation action, provided that (A) the condemnation proceedings have not been instituted under Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title and (B) the condemnor has first paid to the condemnee all expenses and damages accrued to the condemnee up to the date of the filing of the motion for dismissal of the condemnation action;

Subject to the requirements of Part 2 of this article, a municipality may purchase, borrow, rent, lease, control, manage, receive, and make payment for all personal property such as equipment, machinery, vehicles, supplies, material, and furniture which may be needed in the operation of the municipal street system and may sell or otherwise dispose of all personal property owned by the municipality and used in the operation of said municipal street system which is no longer necessary or useful in connection with the operation of said system; and it may execute such instruments as may be necessary in connection with the exercise of the foregoing powers in this paragraph;

A municipality and its authorized agents and employees shall have the authority to enter upon any lands in the municipality for the purpose of making such surveys, soundings, drillings, and examinations as the municipality may deem necessary or desirable to accomplish the purposes of this title; and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass, nor shall it be deemed an entry which would constitute a taking in a condemnation proceeding. However, reasonable notice shall be given the owner or occupant of the property to be entered; such entry shall be done in a reasonable manner with as little inconvenience as possible to the owner or occupant of the property; and the municipality shall make reimbursement for any actual damages resulting from such entry;

A municipality may employ, discharge, promote, set and pay the salaries and compensation of its personnel, and determine the duties, qualifications, and working conditions for all persons whose services are needed in the construction, maintenance, administration, operation, and development of its municipal street system; and may employ or contract as independent contractors with such engineers, surveyors, attorneys, consultants, and all other employees whose services may be required, subject to the limitations of existing law;

Except as otherwise provided by Code Section 12-6-24, a municipality may regulate and control the use of the public roads on its municipal street system and on portions of the county road systems extending within the corporate limits of the municipality. Any municipality may regulate the parking of vehicles on any such roads in order to facilitate the flow of traffic and to this end may require and place parking meters on or immediately adjacent to any or all of such roads for the purpose of authorizing timed parking in designated spaces upon the payment of a charge for such privilege. A municipality also may place such parking meters on or adjacent to any public road on the state highway system located within the corporate limits of the municipality when authorized by the department pursuant to Code Section 32-6-2;

A municipality may purchase supplies for municipal street system purposes through the state, as authorized by Code Sections 50-5-100 through 50-5-102;

A municipality may provide lighting and maintenance thereof on any public road located within its limits;

A municipality may grant permits and establish reasonable regulations for the installation, construction, maintenance, renewal, removal, and relocation of pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, poles, towers, traffic and other signals, and other equipment, facilities, or appliances of any utility in, on, along, over, or under any part of its municipal street system and of a county road system lying within its municipal limits. However, such regulations shall not be more restrictive with respect to utilities affected thereby than are equivalent regulations promulgated by the department with respect to utilities on the state highway system under authority of Code Section 32-6-174. As a condition precedent to the granting of such permits, the municipality may require application in writing specifically describing the nature, extent, and location of the portion of the utility affected. The municipality may also require the applicant to furnish an indemnity bond or other acceptable security conditioned to pay for any damage to any part of a public road or to any member of the public caused by the work of the utility performed under authority of such permit. However, it shall be the duty of the municipality to ensure that the normal operation of the utility does not interfere with the use of any portion of the municipal street system or of a municipal extension of a county public road. The municipality may also order the removal and relocation of the utility, equipment, facilities, or appliances where such removal and relocation is made necessary by the construction and maintenance of any part of the municipal street system or municipal extension of a county public road. In so ordering the removal and relocation of a utility or in performing such work itself, the municipality shall conform to the procedure set forth for the department in Code Sections 32-6-171 and 32-6-173, except that when the removal and relocation have been performed by the municipality, it shall certify the expenses thereof for collection to its city attorney; and

A municipality may provide for surveys, maps, specifications, and other things necessary in supervising, locating, abandoning, relocating, improving, constructing, or maintaining the municipal street system, or any part thereof, or any activities incident thereto or necessary in doing such other work on public roads as the municipality may be given responsibility for or control of by law.

In addition to the powers specifically delegated to it in this title, a municipality shall have the authority to perform all acts which are necessary, proper, or incidental to the efficient operation and development of the municipal street system; and this title shall be liberally construed to that end. Any such power vested by law in a municipality, but not implemented by specific provisions for the exercise thereof, may be executed and carried out by a municipality in a reasonable manner pursuant to such rules, regulations, and procedures as a municipality may adopt and subject to such limitations as may be provided by law.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 95A-503, 95A-504, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 775, § 6; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1737, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1126, § 3.

Cross references.

Assessments by municipalities for street improvements, T. 36, C. 39.

Use of parking meter receipts to pay principal, interest, and other expenses of revenue bonds issued to finance public parking areas or public parking buildings, §

36-82-62

.

U.S. Code.

The Uniform Relocation System and Real Property Acquisition Policy Act of 1970, referred to in this Code section, is codified as 42 U.S.C. Ch. 61.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 31 (2004).

For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005).

32-4-93.
Liability of municipalities for defects in public roads.

A municipality is relieved of any and all liability resulting from or occasioned by defects in the public roads of its municipal street system when it has not been negligent in constructing or maintaining the same or when it has no actual notice thereof or when such defect has not existed for a sufficient length of time for notice thereof to be inferred.

A municipality is relieved of any and all liability resulting from or occasioned by defective construction of those portions of the state highway system or county road system lying within its corporate limits or resulting from the failure of the department or the county to maintain such roads as required by law unless the municipality constructed or agreed to perform the necessary maintenance of such road.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 749; Civil Code 1910, § 898; Code 1933, § 69-303; Ga. L. 1961, p. 469, § 4; Code 1933, § 95A-505, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Liability of municipal corporations for acts or omissions of officers, T. 36, C. 33.

Law reviews.

For article discussing necessity of liability insurance for Georgia counties and municipalities, and constitutional authority of the units to provide such insurance, see 25 Ga. B.J. 35 (1962).

For article discussing Georgia’s practice of exposing municipalities to tort liability through the use of nuisance law, see 12 Ga. St. B. J. 11 (1975).

For note discussing state liability for highway defects and waiver of sovereign immunity under U.S. Const., amend. 11, see 27 Emory L.J. 337 (1978).

For article discussing origin and construction of Georgia statute concerning municipal liability for street defects, see 14 Ga. L. Rev. 239 (1980).

For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

For annual survey article discussing local government law, see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 397 (1999).

For survey article on local government law for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 353 (2003).

For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006).

32-4-94.
Standards for construction of curb ramps.

The standard for construction of curbs on each side of any municipal street or of any connecting street or road for which curbs have been prescribed by the governing body of the municipal corporation having jurisdiction thereover shall be not less than one ramp per lineal block giving on the crosswalks at intersections. Such ramps shall be at least 40 inches wide and shall be so constructed as to allow reasonable access to the crosswalk for physically disabled persons.

Standards set for curb ramping under subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to any curb existing on July 1, 1974, but shall apply to all new curb construction and to all replacement curbs constructed at any point in a block which gives reasonable access to a crosswalk; provided, however, that the standards set for curb ramping under subsection (a) of this Code section shall apply to curbs on each side of the street circling the state capitol; provided, further, that the standard for construction of curbs on each side of the street circling the state capitol shall be not less than two ramps per lineal block giving on the crosswalks at intersections.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 514, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 14.

Cross references.

Access to and use of public facilities by physically disabled persons generally, T. 30, C. 3.